Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
68-1924
Underpayment or overpayment; notice.

If the department
determines that a nursing facility or skilled nursing facility has underpaid
or overpaid the quality assurance assessment, the department shall notify
the nursing facility or skilled nursing facility of the unpaid quality assurance
assessment or refund due. Such payment or refund shall be due or refunded
within thirty days after the issuance of the notice.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 24.
July 1, 2011